Spell/Test 1/german.aff
flag M: 	# CHEN diminuitiv:
	[^SS]	>	CHEN		# Tür		> Türchen
	[^SS]	>	CHENS		# Heft		> Heftchens
#	A S E	>	-ASE,A"SCHEN
#	O S E	>	-OSE,O"SCHEN
#	U S E	>	-USE,U"SCHEN
	A SS	>	-ASS,A"SSCHEN
	A SS	>	-ASS,A"SSCHENS
	O SS	>	-OSS,O"SSCHEN
	O SS	>	-OSS,O"SSCHENS
	U SS	>	-USS,U"SSCHEN
	U SS	>	-USS,U"SSCHENS


flag *A:	# for adjectives:
    E			>	R	# Wie älteste	> ältester
    E			>	N	#
    E			>	M	#
    E			>	S	#
    [^ELR]		>	E	# Wie formbar	> formbare
    [^ELR]		>	ER	#     formbar	> formbarer
    [^ELR]		>	EN	#     formbar	> formbaren
    [^ELR]		>	EM	#     formbar	> formbarem
    [^ELR]		>	ES	#     formbar	> formbares
    [^E] [RL]		>	E	#     schnell	> schnelle
    [^E] [RL]		>	ER	#     schal	> schale
    [^E] [RL]		>	EN
    [^E] [RL]		>	EM
    [^E] [RL]		>	ES
    [^U] E R		>	E	# Wie schwer	> schwere
    [^U] E R		>	ER
    [^U] E R		>	EN
    [^U] E R		>	EM
    [^U] E R		>	ES

    U E R		>	-ER,RE	# Wie teuer	> teure
    U E R		>	-ER,RER	#     sauer	> saurer
    U E R		>	-ER,REN
    U E R		>	-ER,REM
    U E R		>	-ER,RES

    [EIL] E L 		>	E		# Wie parallel	> parallele
    [EIL] E L 		>	ER		#     viel	> viele
    [EIL] E L 		>	EN		#     scheel	> scheele
    [EIL] E L 		>	EM
    [EIL] E L 		>	ES
    [^EIL] E L 		>	-EL,LE		# Wie eitel	> eitle #nn .. no fel\/.*A
    [^EIL] E L 		>	-EL,LER 	#     simpel	> simple #nn
    [^EIL] E L 		>	-EL,LEN #nn
    [^EIL] E L 		>	-EL,LEM #nn
    [^EIL] E L 		>	-El,LES #nn

	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIG		# adlig > adelig
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGE
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGER
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGEN
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGEM
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGES
	
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIG	# zitterig > zittrig
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGE
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGER
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGEN
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGEM
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGES


flag *C:		# for comparative forms of adjectives:
    [^ELR]	>	ERE		# Wie neu	> neuere
    [^ELR]	>	ERER	#
    [^ELR]	>	EREN	#
    [^ELR]	>	EREM	#
    [^ELR]	>	ERES	#

	[E]	>	RE	# prüde > prüdere
	[E]	>	RER
	[E]	>	REN
	[E]	>	REM
	[E]	>	RES

    [^E] [LR]	>	ERE		# Wie schmal	> schmale
    [^E] [LR]	>	ERER	#
    [^E] [LR]	>	EREN	#
    [^E] [LR]	>	EREM	#
    [^E] [LR]	>	ERES	#

    E L 	>	-EL,LERE	# Wie eitel	> eitlere #nn ... no fel\/.*C
    E L 	>	-EL,LERER	#nn
    E L 	>	-EL,LEREN	#nn
    E L 	>	-EL,LEREM	#nn
    E L 	>	-EL,LERES	#nn

    U E R	>	-ER,RERE	# Wie teuer	> teurere
    U E R	>	-ER,RERER	#
    U E R	>	-ER,REREN	#
    U E R	>	-ER,REREM	#
    U E R	>	-ER,RERES	#

    [^U] E R	>	ERE	# Wie schwer	> schwerere
    [^U] E R	>	ERER	#
    [^U] E R	>	EREN	#
    [^U] E R	>	EREM	#
    [^U] E R	>	ERES	#

	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGERE		# adlig > adeligere
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGERER
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGEREN
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGEREM
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGERES
	
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGERE	# zitterig > zittrigere
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGERER
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGEREN
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGEREM
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGERES
# superlatives ...	
    [KsSSSSUXZ]	>	ESTE	# Wie neu	> neueste
    [KsSSSSUXZ]	>	ESTER
    [KsSSSSUXZ]	>	ESTEN	#     mies	> miesesten
    [KsSSSSUXZ]	>	ESTEM	#     lax	> laxestem
    [KsSSSSUXZ]	>	ESTES	#     spitz	> spitzestes
	
	E T	>	STE	# geeignet > geeignetste
	E T	>	STER
	E T	>	STEN
	E T	>	STEM
	E T	>	STES

	[^E] T	>	ESTE	#	matt > matteste
	[^E] T	>	ESTER
	[^E] T	>	ESTEN
	[^E] T	>	ESTEM
	[^E] T	>	ESTES

    [^KsSSSSTXZ]	>	STE	#     teuer	> teuerste
    [^KsSSSSTXZ]	>	STER	#     dick	> dickster
    [^KsSSSSTXZ]	>	STEN	#     lahm	> lahmsten
    [^KsSSSSTXZ]	>	STEM	#     teuer	> teuerstem
    [^KsSSSSTXZ]	>	STES	#     teuer	> teuerstes

	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGSTE		# adlig > adeligste
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGSTER
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGSTEN
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGSTEM
	[^AEIOUHLA"U"O"] L I G	>	-LIG,ELIGSTES

	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGSTE	# zitterig > zittrig
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGSTER
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGSTEN
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGSTEM
	[^HI] E R I G	>	-ERIG,RIGSTES

# a few 'catch all' plural forms:
# All plurals seem to boil down to one of 'N', 'E', 'P' or 'Q'
# (or are 'irregular')

flag *E:
    .			>	E		# Wie Wind	> Winde


flag *f:
	P H 	>	-PH,F	# Paragraph > Paragraf
	P H 	>	-PH,FEN
	P H I E	>	-PHIE,FIE	# Typographie > Typografie #nn
	P H I E	>	-PHIE,FIEN #nn

flag *N:
    .			>	N		# Wie Lampe	> Lampen

flag *P:
    .			>	EN		# Wie Tat	> Taten

flag *p:
# this is for some irregular plural forms with vowel -> umlaut conversions
	A U F	>	-AUF,A"UFE	# Lauf > Läufe
	A U F	>	-AUF,A"UFEN
	H A U S	>	-AUS,A"USER		# Haus > Häuser
	H A U S	>	-AUS,A"USERN
	M A R K T	>	-ARKT,A"RKTE	# Markt > Märkte
	M A R K T	>	-ARKT,A"RKTEN
	A N G	>	-ANG,A"NGE	# Gang > Gänge
	A N G	>	-ANG,A"NGEN
	U sS	>	-UsS,U"sSE	# Gruß > Grüße #swiss-del
	U sS	>	-UsS,U"sSEN #swiss-del
	O sS	>	-OsS,O"sSE	# Stoß > Stöße #swiss-convert
	O sS	>	-OsS,O"sSEN #swiss-convert
	A U M	>	-AUM,A"UME	# Raum > Räume
	A U M	>	-AUM,A"UMEN
	A G	>	-AG,A"GE	# Betrag > Beträge
	A G	>	-AG,A"GEN
	U G	>	-UG,U"GE	# Zug > Züge
	U G	>	-UG,U"GEN
#	A N D	>	-AND,A"NDE  #... ??? TODO ???
#	A N D	>	-AND,A"NDEN #... ???
	A L L	>	-ALL,A"LLE	# Fall > Fälle
	A L L	>	-ALL,A"LLEN
    A SS	>	-ASS,A"SSE	#	Pass > Pässe
    A SS	>	-ASS,A"SSEN
    U SS	>	-USS,U"SSE	#	Nuss > Nüsse
    U SS	>	-USS,U"SSEN
#  be carefull with Erlass, Fass, Hass, Kompass, ???,
#	Stuss, ..druss, ???        ... they don't pluralize via the /p flag !

flag *R:
	[^E]	>	ER		# Wie Licht	> Lichter
	[^E]	>	ERN		#     Licht	> Lichtern
	E		>	R		# Beamte > Beamter

flag *S:
	.	>	S	# Wolfgang > Wolfgangs


flag *q:		# for feminin nouns who don't have -SSES like `Erlaubnisses'
    S	>	-S,SSE		#	Erlaubnis  > Erlaubnisse
    S	>	-S,SSEN 	#	Erlaubnis  > Erlaubnissen
	
flag *Q:	
    S	>	-S,SSE		#	Geheimnis  > Geheimnisse
    S	>	-S,SSEN 	#	Geheimnis  > Geheimnissen
    S	>	-S,SSES 	#	Geheimnis  > Geheimnisses


########

# Genitiv seperate -s and -es, many words may take them both! (Muts, Mutes)
flag *T:
    .			>	ES		# Platz	> Platzes
							# Reis	> Reises

# verbs:

flag *J: 	# -ung (verb -> noun)
# capitalization problem revisited!
   E L N	>	-ELN,LUNG	# Wie handeln	> Handlung #nn
   E R N	>	-N,UNG		#     wandern	> Wanderung
   E N		>	-EN,UNG 	#     reiben	> Reibung
   E L N	>	-ELN,LUNGEN	#     handeln	> Handlungen #nn
   E R N	>	-N,UNGEN	#     wandern	> Wanderungen
   E N		>	-EN,UNGEN	#     reiben	> Reibungen
   [^N] 	>	UNG		#     Bild	> Bildung
   [^N] 	>	UNGEN		#     Abbild	> Abbildungen

flag B: 	# -bar	(verb -> adj.):
    E [LR] N	>	-N,BAR		# Wie wundern	> wunderbar
    E [LR] N	>	-N,BARE 
    E [LR] N	>	-N,BAREN
    E [LR] N	>	-N,BARER
    E [LR] N	>	-N,BARES
    E [LR] N	>	-N,BAREM
    E N		>	-EN,BAR 	#     halten	> haltbar
    E N		>	-EN,BARE
    E N		>	-EN,BAREN
    E N		>	-EN,BARER
    E N		>	-EN,BARES
    E N		>	-EN,BAREM

flag *D:	# -d..	(verb -> Partizip Präs.):
    N	>	D		# Wie schlafen	> schlafend
    N	>	DE		#     schlafen	> schlafende
    N	>	DEN		#     schlafen	> schlafenden
    N	>	DER		#     schlafen	> schlafender
    N	>	DES		#     schlafen	> schlafendes
    N	>	DEM		#     schlafen	> schlafendem

flag *W:
# Du-form imperative endings
    [^IMN] E N	>	-EN,-		# Wie reimen	> reim
    E I E N		>	-EN,-		#     schreien	> schrei
						# aber nicht: knien > kni
    [^BGHT] [MN] E N	>	-EN,-		#     rennen	> renn
    [^C] H N E N	>	-EN,-		#     dehnen	> dehn

    E L N	>	-N,-		#     lächeln	> lächel
    E R N	>	-N,-		#     nähern	> näher
						# otherwise: ich-ending below
# Du-form imperative endings from du- or er/sie/es-form:
    S T 		>	-ST,-		# Wie trittst	> tritt
    [^S] T		>	-T,-		#     nimmt	> nimm #nn

#
# Present tense:
#
# ich, ihr-forms are seperated from du,er/sie/es-forms.
# Many (starke) verbs can only build the ich,ihr-form from the infinitive.
#	tragen/I > trage, tragt
#
# Also flag X is sometimes useful for past tense of Konjunktiv:
#	abnahmen/X > abnahmst, abnahmt
#
# For present tense regular (schwache) verbs, I and X will go together.
#
flag *I:
# ich
    E N 		>	-N,-		# Wie kommen	> komme
#    E L N 	>	-ELN,QQLE 	#     lächeln	> lächle #qqq
    E L N 	>	-ELN,LE 	#     lächeln	> lächle #nnn
    E L N		>	-N,E		# auch: lächeln > lächele
    E R N 	>	-ERN,RE 	#     wandern	> wandre
    E R N		>	-N,E		# auch: nähern > nähere

# Ihr-form endings (redundant with er/sie/es most of the time)
    E [LR] N		>	-N,T		# Wie lächeln	> lächelt
    [DT] E N		>	-N,T
#    [^DIMNT] E N	>	-EN,QQT	#qq schaff"|t
    [^DIMNT] E N	>	-EN,T	#nn

    E I E N		>	-EN,T		#     schreien	> schreit
    [^E] I E N		>	-N,T		#     knien	> kniet

    C H N E N		>	-N,T
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,T		# Wie nehmen	> nehmt


    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-N,T
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-EN,T

# special treatment for 'tun': (worthwile?)
    U N 		>	-N,E		#     tun > ich tue
    U N 		>	-N,EN		#     tun > wir tuen
    U N 		>	-N,T		#     tun > er	tut


flag *X:	# other present tense verb endings:
# Er/sie/es-form endings
    E [LR] N		>	-N,T		# Wie lächeln	> lächelt
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,T		#     arbeiten	> arbeitet
    E I E N		>	-EN,T		#     schreien	> schreit
# old form:
#    E I E N		>	-N,T		#     schreien	> schreiet

    [^E] I E N		>	-N,T		#     knien	> kniet
#    [^DITMNW] E N	>	-EN,QQT		#     leben	> lebt #qq schaff"|t
    [^DITMNW] E N	>	-EN,T		#     leben	> lebt #nn

    C H N E N		>	-N,T		# Wie rechnen	> rechnet
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,T		#     ahnen	> ahnt

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-N,T		# Wie atmen	> atmet
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N
			>	-EN,T		# Wie lernen	> lernt


# old fashioned imperative and ihr- form:
#    [BFGHKLMNPRSsSVX] E N
#			>	-N,T		# Wie lernen	> lernet

    U N 		>	-N, T		#     tun	> tut
# old fashioned form:
#   U N 		>	-N, ET		#     tun	> tuet

# Er/sie/es-form ending from Du-form:
    T S T		>	-ST,-		# Wie trittst	> tritt

# Du-form endings
    E [LR] N		>	-N,ST		# Wie nähern	> näherst
    [DTW] E N		>	-N,ST		#     arbeiten	> arbeitest
    [^DIMNsSSSSTWZX] E N >	-EN,ST		#     leben	> lebst

    E I E N		>	-EN,ST		#     schreien	> schreist
    [^E] I E N		>	-N,ST		#     knien	> kniest

    C H N E N		>	-N,ST		# Wie rechnen	> rechnest
    [^C] H [MN] E N	>	-EN,ST		#     ahnen	> ahnst

    [^AA"EHILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-N,ST	# Wie atmen	> atmest
    [AA"EILMNOO"UU"R] [MN] E N	>	-EN,ST	# Wie lernen	> lernst

    U N	>	-N, ST		#     tun	> tust

    [sSSSSXZ] E N	>	-N,ST 	# Wie heisSen	> heisSest

#   alternate form for -schen:
    S C H E N		>	-N,ST 	#     wischen	> wischest


# Du-form ending from Er/sie/es-form:
    [^SZ] T		>	-T,ST		# Wie nimmt	> nimmst
    Z T 		>	-T,EST		#     schmilzt	> schmilzest
